Rhode Island, session 2025, SB359.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 11 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINAL OFFENSES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 47.2
UNLAWFUL SALE OF PROHIBITED FIREARMS
11-47.2-1. Definitions.
When used in this chapter:
(1) "Ammunition feeding device" means a magazine, box, drum, tube, belt, feed strip, or
device which is capable of holding ammunition to be fed continuously and directly therefrom into
a semi-automatic firearm. The term shall not include an attached tubular device which is capable
of holding only .22 caliber rimfire ammunition.
(2) "Detachable magazine" means an ammunition feeding device that attaches to a firearm
and which can be removed without disassembly of the firearm, including an ammunition feeding
device that may be readily removed from a firearm with the use of a bullet, cartridge, accessory, or
other tool, or any other object that functions as a tool.
(3) "Federally licensed firearm dealer" means a person who holds a valid federal firearm
dealers license issued pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).
(4) "Fixed magazine" means an ammunition feeding device that is permanently fixed to the
firearm in such a manner that it cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm, or contained

in and not removable from a firearm, or that is otherwise not a detachable magazine, but does not
include an attached tubular device designed to accept, and capable of operating only with, .22
caliber rimfire ammunition.
(5) "Folding or telescoping stock" means a stock that folds, telescopes, detaches or
otherwise operates to reduce the length, size, or any other dimension, or otherwise enhances the
concealability, of a firearm.
(6) "Forward grip" means a grip or handle located forward of the trigger.
(7) "Grenade launcher" means a device designed to fire, launch or propel a grenade.
(8) "Pistol grip" means a well-defined handle, similar to that found on a handgun, that
protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon, and which permits the firearm to be held
and fired with one hand.
(9) "Prohibited firearm" means:
(i) A semi-automatic shotgun that has a fixed magazine capacity exceeding six (6) rounds;
(ii) Any shotgun with a revolving cylinder;
(iii) A semi-automatic rifle with a fixed magazine capacity exceeding ten (10) rounds;
(iv) A semi-automatic rifle that has the ability to accept a detachable magazine, and has at
least one of the following features:
(A) A folding or telescoping stock;
(B) A bayonet mount;
(C) A grenade launcher;
(D) A shroud attached to the barrel or that partially or completely encircles the barrel,
allowing the bearer to hold the firearm with the non-trigger hand without being burned, except an
extension of the stock along the bottom of the barrel, which does not encircle or substantially
encircle the barrel.
(E) A pistol grip or thumbhole stock; or
(F) A flash suppressor or threaded barrel designed to accommodate a flash suppressor;
(v) A semi-automatic pistol that has a fixed magazine capacity exceeding ten (10) rounds;
(vi) A semi-automatic firearm that has the capacity to accept a belt ammunition feeding
device;
(vii) "Prohibited firearm" shall not include a semi-automatic rifle which has an attached
tubular device and which is capable of operating only with .22 caliber rimfire ammunition.
(10) "Semi-automatic" means a firearm which fires a single projectile for each single pull
of the trigger and is self-reloading or automatically chambers a round, cartridge, or bullet.
(11) "Threaded barrel" means threads on the muzzle end of a barrel and shall include, but
LC001183/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 4

not be limited to, any barrel on which a flash suppressor, muzzle brake or silencer has been attached.
11-47.2-2. Restrictions on manufacture, sale, and purchase of prohibited firearms.
(a) No person shall manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, or purchase a prohibited
firearm, except as otherwise authorized under this section. Any person convicted of violating this
subsection shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine up to
ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and the prohibited firearm shall be subject to forfeiture.
(b) The following limited exceptions to subsection (a) of this section shall apply:
(1) A person who lawfully possesses a prohibited firearm may sell, offer to sell, or transfer
their prohibited firearm to a federally licensed firearm dealer, or to an individual outside the state
who may lawfully possess such weapon.
(2) A federally licensed firearm dealer may sell, offer to sell, or transfer a prohibited
firearm to another federally licensed firearm dealer, or to a law enforcement entity identified in
subsection (b)(3) of this section, or to an individual outside the state who may lawfully possess
such weapon.
(3) A law enforcement agency, acting under authority of the United States, the state or any
of its political subdivisions, to import or purchase a prohibited firearm and may lawfully sell, offer
to sell, or transfer a prohibited firearm to a federally licensed firearm dealer or to another law
enforcement agency, acting under authority of the United States or a state or any of its political
subdivisions.
11-47.2-3. Severability.
If any provision of the chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is
held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or applications of this chapter,
which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this chapter are declared to be severable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC001183/SUB A/2
========
LC001183/SUB A/2 - Page 3 of 4